District of Columbia statutes.
22-1802

“Anything of value” defined.

The words “anything of value,” wherever they occur in this title and the District of Columbia Theft and White Collar Crimes Act of 1982, shall be held to include not only things possessing intrinsic value, but bank notes and other forms of paper money, and commercial paper and other writings which represent value.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1336, ch. 854, § 905
Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164,§ 601(c), 29 DCR 3976
1981 Ed., § 22-102.
1973 Ed., § 22-102.
The “District of Columbia Theft and White Collar Crimes Act of 1982”, referred to in this section, is D.C. Law 4-164, codified primarily at § 22-3201 et seq.